Tennessee, session 114, HB0590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-6-101(a)(3)(B)(i), is amended by
deleting "twice" and substituting "three (3) times".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0590
002440
- 1 -